Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 7. Records and Reports

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-701.
Right to information.

Unless the operating agreement of a statutory foundation provides otherwise, upon written request by a beneficiary, the foundation shall provide, within a reasonable time, a copy of the operating agreement of the foundation to the beneficiary. Information regarding beneficiaries other than the beneficiary making a request under this section may be redacted.

Upon written request by a protector, a statutory foundation shall provide all information requested by the protector within a reasonable time. After the death of the last founder of a statutory foundation and if there is no protector, the foundation shall provide all information requested by a beneficiary within a reasonable time, upon written request by a beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no beneficiary shall have the right to receive information related to the administration, operation or affairs of a statutory foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 98, § 1, effective April 5, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

substituted "and" for "or" preceding "if there is no" in (b).

Laws 2021, ch. 98, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 5, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-702.
Recordkeeping and identification of statutory foundation property.

The board of directors of a statutory foundation shall keep and maintain adequate records regarding the administration of the foundation.

The board of directors of a statutory foundation may invest property of two (2) or more statutory foundations as a whole as long as the board maintains clear records indicating the respective interests of each foundation.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-703.
Annual report for secretary of state.

Every statutory foundation formed under the laws of this state and every foreign foundation that obtains a certificate of registration shall file an annual report, under penalty of perjury, with the secretary of state on or before the first day of the month of formation. The annual report shall contain the address of the principal office of the statutory foundation or the foreign foundation.

If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the secretary of state shall promptly notify the reporting statutory foundation or foreign foundation in writing and return the annual report for correction.

Every statutory foundation formed under the laws of this state and every foreign foundation registered in this state shall preserve annual reports at its principal office for three (3) years after submission to the secretary of state.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 17-30-704.
Fees; annual fee.

The secretary of state shall collect the following fees from statutory foundations and foreign statutory foundations:

Filing the original articles of formation or issuing a certificate of authority for a foreign statutory foundation, a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00);

Filing amended articles of formation, a fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00);

Filing the annual report required under W.S.

17-30-703

, due and payable on or before the date of the annual filing, a fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00);

A fee for other services provided by the secretary of state which is not established by this section, including other filings, service of process and copying, provided the fee shall not exceed the actual cost of the service.

History.

2019 ch. 190, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 190, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.